Florida, session 2026, SB1356.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 63 64 Section 1.âSection 585.701, Florida Statutes, is created to 65 read: 66 585.701âDog breeders; best management practices.â 67 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the safe and ethical 68 breeding of dogs in this state is a matter of great public 69 importance, and that breeding dogs for profit without regard for 70 the condition in which the dogs live or how they are cared for 71 is an act of animal cruelty. Therefore, the Legislature intends 72 to ensure that dog breeding is done in an ethical manner by 73 establishing best management practices to ensure the humane 74 treatment of animals. 75 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 76 (a)ââBoardâ means the Board of Veterinary Medicine. 77 (b)ââBreeding female dogâ means a dog that has not been 78 spayed and is more than 6 months old and capable of 79 reproduction. 80 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 81 Consumer Services. 82 (d)ââDog breederâ means a person who owns or possesses 83 breeding female dogs and offers for sale more than two litters 84 of dogs per calendar year. 85 (e)ââDog breeding facilityâ means a location that is the 86 site of a dog breeder which houses five or more breeding female 87 dogs. 88 (f)ââLitterâ means the collection of dogs birthed, whether 89 naturally or from cesarean section, from a breeding female dog 90 from the same pregnancy. 91 (3)âThe department shall: 92 (a)âDevelop and adopt rules, best management practices, and 93 other measures necessary to improve the practices of dog 94 breeders and dog breeding facilities in a way that protects this 95 stateâs domestic animal resources and preserves a viable and 96 ethical dog breeding industry. In developing the rules, the 97 department shall consider, at a minimum, the spacing of and 98 sanitation guidelines for cages and pens, requiring adequate 99 access to clean water, limiting the number of times a breeding 100 female dog may be bred per year, and providing breeding female 101 dogs and their litters with appropriate shelter. 102 (b)âBefore adopting any rules, best management practices, 103 and other measures required by paragraph (a), submit the 104 proposed rules to the board. The board shall verify that the 105 proposed rules, best management practices, and other measures 106 developed by the department will be reasonably effective in 107 achieving the goals of this section. The board shall notify the 108 department of its initial verification. 109 (4)âThis section may not be construed to prohibit a local 110 jurisdiction from implementing requirements for dog breeders or 111 dog breeding facilities which are stricter than those in this 112 section or any rule adopted by the department. 113 Section 2.âSection 828.265, Florida Statutes, is created to 114 read: 115 828.265âRegulation of animal shelters.â 116 (1)âThe Legislature finds that a lack of resources, 117 training, and consistent enforcement of rules at the local level 118 has resulted in an undermining of the public trust of, and a 119 failure to protect vulnerable animals housed in, local animal 120 shelters. Therefore, the Legislature intends to provide 121 statewide oversight of local animal shelters to ensure 122 consistent implementation and enforcement of rules governing 123 local animal shelters. 124 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 125 (a)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Agriculture and 126 Consumer Services. 127 (b)ââLocal animal shelterâ includes city and county animal 128 rescues and animal shelters. 129 (3)âThe regulatory and operational oversight of local 130 animal shelters is preempted to the department. 131 (4)âThe department shall adopt rules governing all of the 132 following: 133 (a)âBasic standards for the care of animals housed in local 134 animal shelters, including providing adequate food, water, 135 shelter, and medical treatment. 136 (b)âMandatory reporting requirements for local animal 137 shelters to report intake, adoption, and euthanasia statistics 138 in a standardized format. 139 (c)âGuidelines for the safe and humane euthanasia of 140 animals. 141 (d)âPeriodic inspections of local animal shelters. 142 (5)âThe department is encouraged to collaborate with 143 reputable nonprofit and private organizations to manage animal 144 shelters. 145 Section 3.âSubsections (5) through (8), (10), (12), and 146 (17) of section 828.29, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 147 subsections (18) through (21) are added to that section, to 148 read: 149 828.29âDogs and cats transported or offered for sale; 150 health requirements; consumer guarantee; disclosures.â 151 (5)âIf, within 14 days after following the sale by a pet 152 dealer of an animal subject to this section, a licensed 153 veterinarian of the consumerâs choosing certifies that, at the 154 time of the sale, the animal was unfit for purchase due to 155 illness or disease, the presence of symptoms of a contagious or 156 infectious disease, or the presence of internal or external 157 parasites, excluding fleas and ticks; or if, within 1 year after 158 following the sale of an animal subject to this section, a 159 licensed veterinarian of the consumerâs choosing certifies such 160 animal to be unfit for purchase due to a congenital or 161 hereditary disorder which adversely affects the health of the 162 animal; or if, within 1 year after following the sale of an 163 animal subject to this section, the breed, sex, or health of 164 such animal is found to have been misrepresented to the 165 consumer, the pet dealer shall afford the consumer the right to 166 choose one of the following options: 167 (a)âThe right to return the animal and receive a refund of 168 the purchase price, including the sales tax, and reimbursement 169 for reasonable veterinary costs directly related to the 170 veterinarianâs examination and certification that the dog or cat 171 is unfit for purchase pursuant to this section and directly 172 related to necessary emergency services and treatment undertaken 173 to relieve suffering. If the consumer financed the animal, the 174 pet dealer must ensure that the financing arrangement is 175 terminated without penalty to the consumer; 176 (b)âThe right to return the animal and receive an exchange 177 dog or cat of the consumerâs choice of equivalent value, and 178 reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs directly related 179 to the veterinarianâs examination and certification that the dog 180 or cat is unfit for purchase pursuant to this section and 181 directly related to necessary emergency services and treatment 182 undertaken to relieve suffering; or 183 (c)âThe right to retain the animal and receive 184 reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs for necessary 185 services and treatment related to the attempt to cure or curing 186 of the dog or cat. 187 188 Reimbursement for veterinary costs may not exceed the purchase 189 price of the animal. The cost of veterinary services is 190 reasonable if comparable to the cost of similar services 191 rendered by other licensed veterinarians in proximity to the 192 treating veterinarian and the services rendered are appropriate 193 for the certification by the veterinarian. 194 (6)âAll financing terms must be disclosed to the consumer 195 before the sale of the animal. A mandatory waiting period of at 196 least 3 calendar days must be imposed between the date of an 197 agreement to purchase an animal and the date on which the 198 consumer takes possession of the animal, if the consumer is 199 financing the animal. A financing agreement may not be signed by 200 the consumer until the conclusion of the 3-day waiting period A 201 consumer may sign a waiver relinquishing his or her right to 202 return the dog or cat for congenital or hereditary disorders. In 203 the case of such waiver, the consumer has 48 normal business 204 hours, excluding weekends and holidays, in which to have the 205 animal examined by a licensed veterinarian of the consumerâs 206 choosing. If the veterinarian certifies that, at the time of 207 sale, the dog or cat was unfit for purchase due to a congenital 208 or hereditary disorder, the pet dealer must afford the consumer 209 the right to choose one of the following options: 210 (a)âThe right to return the animal and receive a refund of 211 the purchase price, including sales tax, but excluding the 212 veterinary costs related to the certification that the dog or 213 cat is unfit; or 214 (b)âThe right to return the animal and receive an exchange 215 dog or cat of the consumerâs choice of equivalent value, but not 216 a refund of the veterinary costs related to the certification 217 that the dog or cat is unfit. 218 (7)âBefore the sale of an animal, a pet dealer must provide 219 to the consumer copies of records of all medical examinations or 220 tests that were conducted on the animal or any medication given 221 before the purchase of the animal. A pet dealer may specifically 222 state at the time of sale, in writing to the consumer, the 223 presence of specific congenital or hereditary disorders, in 224 which case the consumer has no right to any refund or exchange 225 for those disorders. 226 (8)âThe refund or exchange required by subsection (5) must 227 or subsection (6) shall be made by the pet dealer not later than 228 10 business days after following receipt of a signed veterinary 229 certification as required in subsection (5) or subsection (6). 230 The consumer must notify the pet dealer within 2 business days 231 after the veterinarianâs determination that the animal is unfit. 232 The written certification of unfitness must be presented to the 233 pet dealer not later than 3 business days after following 234 receipt thereof by the consumer. 235 (10)âIf a pet dealer wishes to contest a demand for 236 veterinary expenses, refund, or exchange made by a consumer 237 under this section, the dealer may require the consumer to 238 produce the animal for examination by a licensed veterinarian 239 designated by the dealer. Upon such examination, if the consumer 240 and the dealer are unable to reach an agreement that constitutes 241 one of the options set forth in subsection (5) or subsection (6) 242 within 10 business days after following receipt of the animal 243 for such examination, the consumer may initiate an action in a 244 court of competent jurisdiction to recover or obtain 245 reimbursement of veterinary expenses, refund, or exchange. 246 (12)âEvery pet dealer who sells an animal to a consumer 247 shall must provide the consumer at the time of sale with a 248 printed, written notice. The pet dealer shall retain a copy of 249 the signed notice, and the consumer must be given a copy of the 250 signed notice. The notice, printed or typed, which is separate 251 from the contract, shall read reads as follows: 252 253 RIGHT TO CANCEL 254 Florida consumers have certain rights under s. 828.29, 255 Florida Statutes. You have the right to return or 256 exchange a dog or cat purchased from a pet dealer and 257 receive reimbursement for certain veterinary expenses. 258 A copy of this law is attached to this notice. 259 260 ...(Signature of Owner, or Ownerâs or Authorized 261 Agent)... 262 263 Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this 264 .... day of ...., ...., by ...(name of person making 265 statement).... 266 267 It is the consumerâs right, pursuant to section 268 828.29, Florida Statutes, to receive a certificate of 269 veterinary inspection with each dog or cat purchased 270 from a pet dealer. Such certificate shall list all 271 vaccines and deworming medications administered to the 272 animal and shall state that the animal has been 273 examined by a Florida-licensed veterinarian who 274 certifies that, to the best of the veterinarianâs 275 knowledge, the animal was found to have been healthy 276 at the time of the veterinary examination. In the 277 event that the consumer purchases the animal and finds 278 it to have been unfit for purchase as provided in 279 section 828.29(5), Florida Statutes, the consumer must 280 notify the pet dealer within 2 business days of the 281 veterinarianâs determination that the animal was 282 unfit. The consumer has the right to retain, return, 283 or exchange the animal and receive reimbursement for 284 certain related veterinary services rendered to the 285 animal, subject to the right of the dealer to have the 286 animal examined by another veterinarian. 287 288 (17)âExcept as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person 289 who violates any provision of this section commits a misdemeanor 290 of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 291 775.083. 292 (18)âA pet dealer shall retain any record provided to a 293 consumer pursuant to the sale of an animal under this section 294 for at least 7 years after the sale. 295 (19)âA retail store that offers animals for sale shall do 296 both of the following: 297 (a)âProvide the city or county animal rescue or animal 298 shelter the opportunity to inventory the animals the rescue or 299 shelter, respectively, has available for adoption before 300 offering retail space to a dog breeder or dog breeding facility. 301 (b)âEnsure the dog breeder or dog breeding facility from 302 which the store has acquired a dog meets the best management 303 practices adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 304 Services pursuant to s. 585.701. 305 (20)âA pet dealer who violates this section commits an 306 unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or 307 practice in violation of part II of chapter 501 and is subject 308 to the penalties and remedies provided for such violations. 309 (21)âIn addition to any other penalties or remedies 310 provided by law, a consumer injured by a violation of this 311 section may bring a civil action to recover damages or punitive 312 damages, including court costs, attorney fees, and related 313 expenses. This section does not limit any right or remedy 314 provided under law. 315 Section 4.âSection 828.291, Florida Statutes, is created to 316 read: 317 828.291âDog breeder certificate of registration.â 318 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 319 (a)ââBreeding female dogâ means a dog that has not been 320 spayed and is more than 6 months old and capable of 321 reproduction. 322 (b)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Business and 323 Professional Regulation. 324 (c)ââDog breederâ means a person who owns or possesses 325 breeding female dogs and offers for sale more than two litters 326 of dogs per calendar year. 327 (d)ââDog breeding facilityâ means a location that is the 328 site of a dog breeder which houses five or more breeding female 329 dogs. 330 (e)ââLitterâ means the collection of dogs birthed, whether 331 naturally or from cesarean section, from a breeding female dog 332 from the same pregnancy. 333 (2)âEach dog breeder in this state must apply to the 334 department, on forms supplied by the department, for a 335 certificate of registration. The certificate of registration 336 must be renewed every 2 years thereafter. To be eligible to 337 receive a certificate of registration, a dog breeder must submit 338 documentation to the department that the breeder meets the best 339 management practices adopted by the Department of Agriculture 340 and Consumer Services pursuant to s. 585.701. 341 (3)âIf the department is notified that a certified dog 342 breeder is not in compliance with the best management practices 343 adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 344 pursuant to s. 585.701, the department may investigate such 345 claim. The department may establish a whistleblower program 346 through which any individual may alert the department or its 347 contracted authority about a violation of s. 585.701. The 348 department may contract with a private entity to administer the 349 whistleblower program. If a private entity is contracted to 350 receive calls, the private entity must provide monthly reports 351 to the department detailing the number of calls received, the 352 number of calls referred to law enforcement, and the status of 353 each case referred to law enforcement. 354 (4)âAny individual, dog breeder, or dog breeding facility 355 that is found to employ any of the following practices or 356 conditions is subject to penalties under s. 828.073 or s. 357 828.12; the individual, dog breeder, or dog breeding facility 358 must be placed on the Department of Law Enforcementâs website 359 pursuant to s. 828.12(7); and the department shall provide all 360 applicable information to law enforcement to pursue criminal 361 charges: 362 (a)âOvercrowding of dogs crammed into cages or pens with no 363 space to move. 364 (b)âEnclosures with significant build-up of feces, urine, 365 and waste. 366 (c)âDogs exhibiting untreated infections or parasites due 367 to unsanitary conditions. 368 (d)âLimited or no access to clean water. 369 (e)âBreeding a female dog more than 2 times per year. 370 (f)âExposing breeding females and their litters to extreme 371 temperatures without appropriate shelter. 372 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.